Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.98.020

Savings clause.

The laws repealed by RCW 9A.98.010 are repealed except with respect to rights and duties which matured, penalties which were incurred, and proceedings which were begun before July 1, 1976.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.92.020.]